California, session 20252026, AB2661.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 125003 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:125003. (a) The department may release a portion of the newborn blood specimen card taken from a newborn to law enforcement pursuant to a formal request from a coroner to identify unidentified human remains or in response to a search warrant if the objective of the warrant is to obtain the DNA of a missing person suspected to be a victim of homicide, kidnapping, child abuse resulting in death, or manslaughter.SEC. 2. Section 125010 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:125010. Commencing July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, the State Department of Public Health shall generate a report that includes each of the following:(a) The total number of any residual screening specimens stored by the California Biobank Program.(b) The number of new residual screening specimens collected during the previous calendar year.(c) The number of inheritable conditions identified by the original screening tests during the previous calendar year.(d) The number of projects utilizing specimens from the California Biobank Program.(e) The number of published research studies where biospecimens from the California Biobank Program were used or referenced and the potential public health benefits from the research.(f) The number of specimens provided by the California Biobank Program for each research project.(g) The number of screening tests waived for religious purposes during the previous calendar year.(h) The number of residual screening specimens destroyed at the request of a parent or adult during the previous calendar year.(i) The number of residual screening samples remaining to be destroyed at the request of a parent or adult during the previous calendar year.(j) The number of requests from a coroner and search warrants received by the California Biobank Program, as described in Section 125003, during the previous calendar year.(k) The number of disclosures granted by the California Biobank Program pursuant to a request from a coroner or a search warrant, as described in Section 125003, during the previous calendar year.